North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 2. Formation; Certificate of Limited Partnership.

§ 59-201.
Certificate of limited partnership.

In order to form a limited partnership, a certificate of limited partnership must be executed and filed in the office of the Secretary of State and set forth:

The name of the limited partnership.

The address, including county and city or town, and street and number, if any, of the registered office and the name of the registered agent at such address for service of process required to be maintained by

G.S. 55D-30

.

If the limited partnership is to dissolve by a specific date, the latest date upon which the limited partnership is to dissolve. If no date for dissolution is specified, there shall be no limit on the duration of the limited partnership.

The name and the address, including county and city or town, and street and number, if any, of each general partner.

The address, including county and city or town, and street and number, if any, of the office at which the records referred to in

G.S. 59-106

are kept, if such records are not kept at the registered office.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified in the certificate of limited partnership, a limited partnership is formed at the effective time and date of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership in the office of the Secretary of State if there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

Domestic limited partnership filings filed prior to October 1, 1986, with the Office of Register of Deeds pursuant to G.S. 59-2(a)(2) shall evidence the existence of limited partnerships formed prior to October 1, 1986, and shall be public notice of only those matters contained in G.S. 59-201(a) and shall be used for no other purpose.

A limited partnership may also be formed through the conversion of another business entity in accordance with Part 10A of this Article.

If the limited partnership is to be a limited liability limited partnership at its formation, then instead of separately filing the application for registration as a limited liability limited partnership, the application for registration shall be included as part of the certificate of limited partnership.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1031, s. 3; 1997-485, s. 24; 1999-369, s. 4.3; 2000-140, s. 17; 2001-358, s. 50(b); 2001-387, ss. 124, 124A, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 59-202.
Amendment to certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment thereto in the office of the Secretary of State. The certificate shall set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of the certificate; and

The amendment to the certificate.

Within 30 days after the happening of any of the following events an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed:

The admission of a new general partner;

The withdrawal of a general partner; or

The continuation of the business under

G.S. 59-801

after an event of withdrawal of a general partner.

A general partner who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the certificate inaccurate in any respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 531, s. 4.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 4.

§ 59-203.
Cancellation of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership shall be cancelled upon the dissolution and the commencement of winding up of the partnership or at any other time that there are no limited partners. A certificate of cancellation shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and set forth:

The name of the limited partnership;

The date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership;

The reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

The effective date of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

Any other information the partners filing the certificate determine.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1997-485, s. 25.

§ 59-204.
Execution of documents.

Each certificate required by this Article to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State shall be executed in the following manner:

An original certificate of limited partnership must be signed by all general partners;

A certificate of amendment must be signed by at least one general partner and by each other partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner; and

A certificate of cancellation must be signed by all general partners.Any other document submitted by a domestic or foreign limited partnership for filing pursuant to this or any other Chapter must be signed by at least one general partner.

Any person may sign a certificate by an attorney-in-fact.

(b1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 10(c), effective January 1, 2002.

The execution of a certificate or amendment by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts stated therein are true.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1991, c. 153, s. 1; 1997-485, s. 22; 1999-369, s. 4.4; 2001-358, ss. 10(b), (c); 2001-387, ss. 125, 155, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§ 59-205.
Execution by judicial act.

If a person fails or refuses to execute a certificate pursuant to

G.S. 59-204

, any other person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal, may petition the court for the county in which the partnership’s registered office is located to direct the execution of the certificate. If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that any person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order an appropriate person to prepare, and the Secretary of State to record, an appropriate certificate.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1999-362, s. 14.

§ 59-206.
Filing requirements.

A document required or permitted by this Article to be filed by the Secretary of State must be filed under Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2; 1987, c. 531, s. 5; 1991, c. 153, s. 2; 1995, c. 539, s. 35; 1997-485, ss. 17, 26; 1999-362, s. 15; 1999-369, ss. 4.5, 4.6; 2001-358, ss. 10(d), 34; 2001-387, ss. 126, 155, 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

§§ 59-206.1,
59-206.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-358, s. 10(e), effective January 1, 2002.

§ 59-207.
Liability for false statement in certificate.

If any certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a false statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any person who executes the certificate, or causes another to execute it on his behalf, and knew, and any general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false at the time the certificate was executed; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any respect within a sufficient time before the statement was relied upon reasonably to have enabled that general partner to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under

G.S. 59-205

.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-208.
Notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the office of the Secretary of State is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated therein as general partners are general partners, but it is not notice of any other fact.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 989, s. 2.

§ 59-209.
Certificate of existence.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic limited partnership or a certificate of authorization for a foreign limited partnership.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic limited partnership’s name or the foreign limited partnership’s name used in this State;

That (i) the domestic limited partnership has filed a certificate of limited partnership under the law of this State, the effective date of the filing, and the period of the domestic limited partnership’s duration, or (ii) the foreign limited partnership is authorized to transact business in this State;

If the limited partnership has registered as a limited liability limited partnership, that the registration has not been cancelled or revoked;

That a certificate of cancellation of the certificate of limited partnership has not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic limited partnership has filed a certificate of limited partnership and has not filed a certificate of cancellation or that the foreign limited partnership is authorized to transact business in this State, and, if applicable, that the domestic limited partnership has registered as a limited liability limited partnership and that such registration has not been cancelled or revoked.

History.

2001-387, s. 127.

§ 59-210.
Limited liability limited partnerships.

To become a limited liability limited partnership, a limited partnership shall file with the Secretary of State an application stating:

The name of the limited liability limited partnership, which must satisfy the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 55D of the General Statutes.

The street address, and mailing address if different from the street address, of its principal office, and the county in which the principal office is located.

The fiscal year end of the limited liability limited partnership.

The terms and conditions on which a limited partnership becomes a limited liability limited partnership shall be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement; provided, however, if the partnership agreement does not contain any such provision, the terms and conditions must be approved (i) in the case of a limited partnership having a partnership agreement that expressly considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, in the manner necessary to amend those provisions, or (ii) in any other case, in the manner necessary to amend the partnership agreement.

A limited partnership becomes a limited liability limited partnership when its application for registration becomes effective.

The status of a limited liability limited partnership and the liability of its partners is not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the application for registration.

A limited liability limited partnership shall promptly amend its registration to reflect any change in the information contained in its application for registration, other than changes that are properly included in other documents filed with the Secretary of State. A registration is amended by filing a certificate of amendment with the Secretary of State. The certificate of amendment shall set forth:

The name of the limited liability limited partnership as reflected on the application for registration;

The date of filing of the application for registration; and

The amendment to the application for registration.

A limited liability limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State. The certificate of cancellation shall set forth:

The name of the limited liability limited partnership as reflected on the application for registration;

The date of filing of the application for registration; and

The effective date and time of cancellation if it is not to be effective at the time of filing the certificate.

A limited liability limited partnership shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 59-84.4

as if it were a registered limited liability partnership.

History.

2001-387, ss. 127, 158; 2001-413, s. 8.

§§ 59-211 through 59-300.

Reserved for future codification purposes.